Mississippi statutes. Title 49. Conservation and Ecology
Chapter 3. Fisheries and Wildlife Research

§ 49-3-1.
Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the “Fisheries and Wildlife Management Law of 1970”.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5840-51; Laws, 1970, ch. 276, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved April 3, 1970).

§ 49-3-3.
Purpose of chapter.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares:

That the economic progress of Mississippi depends in large measure upon the development and use of the natural resources of the state;

That the fish and game animals indigenous to the state constitute a vital segment of the natural resources available in Mississippi;

That Mississippi has approximately five million (5,000,000) acres of idle agricultural land in the state which are producing mainly broomsedge and brush. Much of this land is potentially excellent game range, yet it is producing almost no significant income for the landowners. These idle acres, plus seventeen million (17,000,000) acres of forest lands properly managed for game and fish products, can contribute substantially to the total economic development of Mississippi;

That there is a tremendous and ever growing need for additional knowledge of fish cultural techniques and the proper management of our environment so that not only fish and game may be increased but that Mississippi may become a more pleasant and a more prosperous state to reside in;

That this chapter is specifically designed to establish a program for the discovery and dissemination of knowledge concerning the management and proper utilization of fish and game resources in Mississippi.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5840-52; Laws, 1970, ch. 276, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved April 3, 1970).

§ 49-3-5.
Establishment of laboratory.

The Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning is hereby authorized and directed to establish a fisheries and wildlife laboratory at Mississippi State University under the direction of the president and such other administrative authorities within the university as such board of trustees may determine.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5840-53; Laws, 1970, ch. 276, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved April 3, 1970).

§ 49-3-7.
Maintenance of laboratory.

The board of trustees of state institutions of higher learning shall provide for such laboratory such buildings, equipment, personnel, supplies and service as it shall determine to be necessary for the proper operation and maintenance of such laboratory, having due regard for the contributory facilities and programs already existing at Mississippi State University.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5840-54; Laws, 1970, ch. 276, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved April 3, 1970).

§ 49-3-9.
Functions.

It shall be the function of the laboratory to conduct a program of research in the culture of fish, the diagnosis and treatment of fish and game animal diseases and the physiology and nutrition of fish and game animals, and to disseminate its findings to the public and to all individuals and agencies for whom such knowledge will be helpful and useful.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5840-55; Laws, 1970, ch. 276, § 5, eff from and after passage (approved April 3, 1970).

§ 49-3-11.
Acceptance of gifts, grants, and contributions.

In addition to the appropriations made by the Mississippi Legislature for the operation and support of the laboratory, the board of trustees of state institutions of higher learning is authorized and empowered to receive contributions, donations, gifts and grants of money and/or property, equipment, materials or manpower from persons, foundations, trust funds, corporations, organizations, the federal government or any subdivision thereof, the state government or any subdivision thereof, to be expended by the board in carrying out the purposes and objectives of this chapter.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5840-56; Laws, 1970, ch, 276, § 6, eff from and after passage (approved April 3, 1970).

§ 49-3-13.
Cooperation with state agencies.

The laboratory personnel shall cooperate fully with the colleges and universities of the state, the Mississippi State Department of Agriculture and Commerce, and the Mississippi Department of Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks in an effort to fully effectuate the purpose of this chapter. All state agencies and departments are hereby authorized and directed to give the laboratory and its personnel their full cooperation in every possible manner.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5840-57; Laws, 1970, ch. 276, § 7; Laws, 2000, ch. 516, § 22, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 30, 2000.).

§ 49-3-15.
Work for other organizations.

The laboratory personnel may, at their discretion, and subject to the approval of the proper administrative authorities at Mississippi State University, do research on a contract or project basis for industries, governmental agencies, public or private organizations or corporations, or any others, at a price and on a basis to be determined by the aforesaid personnel. The proceeds derived from such research projects shall be deposited to a special fund in the treasury of the state of Mississippi to be known as the “fisheries and wildlife laboratory fund,” to be disbursed and used pursuant to appropriation approved by the Legislature as provided by law.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5840-58; Laws, 1970, ch. 276, § 8; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 231, eff from and after July 1, 1984.

§ 49-3-17.
“Fish” defined; effect of chapter on authority of other agencies.

The word “fish” as appears in this chapter shall mean “fresh water fish”. The provisions of this chapter shall not amend, repeal or diminish the authority heretofore vested in the Mississippi Commission on Marine Resources or the work and function of the Gulf Coast Research Laboratory.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5840-59; Laws, 1970, ch. 276, § 9; Laws, 1994, ch. 578, § 57, eff from and after July 1, 1994.